Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-914.02
Tribe or tribal, defined.

Tribe or tribal means an Indian tribe or band which is located in whole or in part within Nebraska and which is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by the state.

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 12.